Georgia, session 2025_26, HB880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits relative to income taxes, is amended
in Code Section 48-7-20, relating to individual tax rates, credit for withholding and other
payments, and applicability to estates and trusts, by revising subsection (a.1) as follows:
H. B. 880
- 1 -

LC 50 1139
"(a.1)(1) On and after January 1, 2024, the tax imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
Code section shall be 5.39 percent for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2024; provided, however, that such rate shall be reduced by 0.10 percent
annually beginning on January 1, 2025, until the rate reaches 4.99 3.99 percent, provided
such annual reductions in the tax rate shall be subject to delays as provided in
paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) Each prospective annual reduction in the tax rate that would otherwise occur as
provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be delayed by one year for each year
that any of the following are true as of December 1:
(A) The Governor's revenue estimate for the succeeding fiscal year is not at least 3
percent above the Governor's revenue estimate for the present fiscal year;
(B) The prior fiscal year's net revenue collection was not higher than each of the
preceding three fiscal years' net tax revenue collection; or
(C) The Revenue Shortfall Reserve provided for in Code Section 45-12-93 does not
contain a sum that exceeds the amount of the decrease in state revenue projected to
occur as a result of the prospective reduction in the tax rates set to occur the following
year.
(3) The Office of Planning and Budget shall make the determinations necessary to
implement the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and shall report its
determinations by December 1 of each year to the department, the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and the chairpersons of the House
Appropriations Committee, the House Ways and Means Committee, the Senate
Appropriations Committee, and the Senate Finance Committee. This paragraph shall not
be applicable after the final reduction to the rate of 4.99 3.99 percent occurs."
H. B. 880
- 2 -

LC 50 1139
SECTION 2.
Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to management of budgetary and financial affairs, is amended by revising Code
Section 45-12-93, relating to revenue shortfall reserve, reservation of surplus state funds,
appropriation and release of funds, and limitations, as follows:
"45-12-93.
(a) There shall be a reserve of state funds known as the 'Revenue Shortfall Reserve.'
(b) The amount of all surplus in state funds existing as of the end of each fiscal year shall
be reserved and added to the Revenue Shortfall Reserve. Funds in the Revenue Shortfall
Reserve shall carry forward from fiscal year to fiscal year, without reverting to the general
fund at the end of a fiscal year. The Revenue Shortfall Reserve shall be maintained,
accumulated, appropriated, and otherwise disbursed only as provided in this Code section.
(c) For each existing fiscal year, the General Assembly may appropriate from the Revenue
Shortfall Reserve an amount up to 1 percent of the net revenue collections of the preceding
fiscal year for funding increased K-12 needs.
(d) The Governor may release for appropriation by the General Assembly a stated amount
from funds in the Revenue Shortfall Reserve that are in excess of 4 percent of the net
revenue of the preceding fiscal year.
(e) As of the end of each fiscal year, an amount shall be released from the Revenue
Shortfall Reserve to the general fund to cover any deficit by which total expenditures and
contractual obligations of state funds authorized by appropriation exceed net revenue and
other amounts in state funds made available for appropriation.
(f) The combined Revenue Shortfall Reserve and the Midyear Adjustment Reserve
existing on May 9, 2005, shall become the Revenue Shortfall Reserve provided for in this
Code section. Any amount of the Revenue Shortfall Reserve exceeding 25 percent of the
previous fiscal year's net revenue may be used for tax relief pursuant to Acts of the General
Assembly.
H. B. 880
- 3 -

LC 50 1139
(g) Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the General Assembly is authorized to
appropriate $7 million for State Fiscal Year 2005 from the Revenue Shortfall Reserve.
(h) The Revenue Shortfall Reserve shall not exceed 15 50 percent of the previous fiscal
year's net revenue for any given fiscal year."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 880
- 4 -